New York, session 2025-2026, A7578.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 7 of section 64 of the alcoholic beverage 2 control law is amended by adding a new paragraph (e-17) to read as 3 follows: 4 (e-17) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subdi- 5 vision, the authority may issue a retail license for on-premises 6 consumption for a premises which shall be located within two hundred 7 feet of a building occupied as a school, church, synagogue or other 8 place of worship, provided such premises constitute a premises for the 9 sale of food or beverages at retail for consumption on the premises 10 located wholly within the boundaries of the county of Orange in the city 11 of Middletown, bounded and described as follows: 12 ALL that certain plot, piece or parcel of land, with the buildings and 13 improvements thereon erected, situate, lying and being in the City of 14 Middletown, County of Orange and State of New York, being shown and 15 designated as Lot No. 10 on a certain map entitled, "Lands of Frank M. 16 Stratton," which map was filed on January 2, 1896 in the Orange County 17 Clerk's Office as Filed Map No. 222, bounded and described as follows: 18 BEGINNING at a point in the westerly line of North Street at the 19 southeasterly corner of lands of 42 North Street LLC (Liber 14773 Page 20 760) and also being the northeasterly most corner of the herein 21 described parcel; 22 THENCE from the said point or place of beginning and following along 23 the westerly line of North Street, South 21 degrees 15 minutes 00 24 seconds West, 23.00 feet to a point; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10683-01-5 A. 7578 2 1 THENCE along the line of lands of Rehoboth Christian Center, Inc. 2 (Liber 4572 Page 146) and along a common party wall, North 68 degrees 45 3 minutes 00 seconds West, 100.25 feet to a point; 4 THENCE along an Alley Way, North 20 degrees 45 minutes 06 seconds 5 East, 23.00 feet to point; 6 THENCE along the lands of said 42 North Street LLC and along a common 7 party wall, South 68 degrees 45 minutes 00 seconds East, 100.45 feet to 8 the point or place of BEGINNING. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.